West Virginia, session 2025, HB2272.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. State Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 11, 2024, authorized under the authority of §11-10-5 of this code, relating to the State Tax Department (exchange of information pursuant to written agreement, 110 CSR 50C), is authorized.